Washington statutes.
RCW 35.16.030

Canvassing the returns—Abstract of vote.

The election returns shall be canvassed as provided in RCW 29A.60.010. If three-fifths of the votes cast on the proposition favor the reduction of the corporate limits, the legislative body of the city or town, by an order entered on its minutes, shall direct the clerk to make and transmit to the office of the secretary of state a certified abstract of the vote. The abstract shall show the total number of voters voting, the number of votes cast for reduction and the number of votes cast against reduction.

[ 2015 c 53 s 27; 1994 c 273 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.16.030. Prior: 1895 c 93 s 1, part; RRS s 8902, part.]

NOTES:

Canvassing returns, generally: Chapter 29A.60 RCW.

Conduct of election—Canvass: RCW 29A.60.010.